Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2903
Accredited veterinarian, defined.

Accredited veterinarian means a veterinarian duly licensed by the State of Nebraska and approved by the administrator of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 3.